Wyoming statutes. Title 11 Agriculture, Livestock and Other Animals
Article 2. Issuance of Bonds and Disposition of Revenues

Cross references. —

As to authority of state and its political subdivisions to invest in federal farm and housing securities, see §

9-4-831

.

Am. Jur. 2d, ALR and C.J.S. references. —

64 Am. Jur. 2d Public Securities and Obligations § 1 et seq.

§ 11-34-201.
Authority to issue nonnegotiable debentures; acceptance by treasurer;
number; amount; interest; security; terms.

The board may issue its nonnegotiable debenture bonds in such numbers and amounts as necessary to be deposited with the state treasurer. The state treasurer shall accept the bonds in lieu of the promissory notes and mortgages held by the board as security for the investment of permanent funds of Wyoming in mortgages upon real estate.

One (1) bond shall be issued for each note, in the amount of the balance due upon the principal of each note to be deposited with the state treasurer. The bond shall bear interest at the same rate as the underlying note and be secured by the original security pledged for the payment to the state of the note for which the bond is issued or substituted, or by any security or property taken by the board in addition to or in lieu of the original security. Each bond is due and payable on the date when the note for which the bond was issued or substituted is due and payable.

History.

Laws 1933, ch. 84, § 1; 1933, Sp. Sess., ch. 31, § 1; 1935, ch. 79, § 1; C.S. 1945, § 21-301; W.S. 1957, § 11-649; Laws 1974, ch. 16, § 2; W.S. 1977, § 11-39-301; 1978, ch. 32, § 1; 1989, ch. 126, § 1.

Cross references. —

As to meaning of “board,” see § 11-34-101(a)(iii).

§ 11-34-202.
Revenue to be credited to an account; use thereof; disposition of excess.

Except as provided by subsection (e) of this section or as otherwise provided by law, the state loan and investment board shall transmit any revenue received to the state treasurer to be credited to a separate account for the purposes specified in W.S. 21-15-106(a) [repealed].

and (c) Repealed by Laws 1981, ch 44, § 2.

Following a general fund appropriation by the legislature for administrative expenses, amounts expended pursuant to the appropriation shall be transferred monthly from the account provided by subsection (a) of this section to the general fund as provided by W.S. 9-4-205(b) for the highway fund and the special revenue fund in certain instances. Revenue currently in the account formerly provided for by W.S. 11-34-202(a), (b) and (c), as those subsections existed prior to the creation of this subsection, may be expended for purposes formerly authorized until July 1, 1982 at which time the revenue within the account shall be credited to the account provided by subsection (a) of this section.

Revenue and proceeds received by the board for deposit in the loss reserve account pursuant to W.S.

11-34-118

, 11-34-120(h),

11-34-121

and 11-34-123(a) shall be transmitted to the state treasurer for deposit to the credit of the loss reserve account. These funds shall be used for the purposes specified in subsection (f) of this section and W.S.

11-34-126

and to pay the administrative and legal expenses of the board in making collections and foreclosing mortgages. If at the end of any fiscal year the amount accumulated in the loss reserve account exceeds five percent (5%) of the total amount of permanent funds of the state invested in farm or water development project loans, the amount in excess of the five percent (5%) shall be transferred and credited to the general fund.

If, as a result of default in the payment of any farm or water development project loan, there occurs a nonrecoverable loss either to the corpus of, or interest due to, any permanent fund of the state, the board shall restore the loss to the permanent fund account entitled thereto using any funds available in the loss reserve account created by subsection (e) of this section. If the funds in the loss reserve account are insufficient to restore the full amount of the loss, the board shall submit a detailed report of the loss to the legislature and shall request an appropriation to restore the balance of the loss to the permanent fund account entitled thereto.

History.

Laws 1929, ch. 154, § 5; R.S. 1931, § 41-138; Laws 1945, ch. 89, § 1; C.S. 1945, § 21-204; W.S. 1957, § 11-647; Laws 1973, ch. 245, § 3; 1974, ch. 16, § 2; 1975, ch. 134, § 1; W.S. 1977, § 11-39-201; Laws 1978, ch. 32, § 1; 1981, ch. 44, §§ 1, 2; 1986, ch. 84, § 1; 1997, ch. 74, § 1; 1998, ch. 13, § 1; 2005, ch. 231, § 1; 2008, ch. 113, § 2; 2011, ch. 109, § 2; 2016 ch. 110, § 2, effective July 1, 2016; 2019 ch. 35, § 1, effective July 1, 2019.

The 2005 amendment

effective July 1, 2005, substituted “a separate account” for “an account within the earmarked revenue fund” in (a); substituted “the special revenue fund” for “trust and agency fund” in (d); and deleted references to the earmarked revenue fund at the end of the first sentence and beginning of the second sentence in (e).

The 2008 amendment,

effective July 1, 2008, substituted “specified in subsection (f) of this section and W.S.

11-34-126

” for “specified in W.S. 9-4-703(c) and

11-34-126

” in (e); and added (f).

The 2011 amendment,

effective July 1, 2011, in (e), added “and

11-34-306

,” and made related changes.

The 2016 amendment

, effective July 1, 2016, substituted “water development project” for “irrigation” near the end of (e) and in the first sentence of (f).

The 2019 amendment,

effective July 1, 2019, in (e), deleted “11-34-302(e) and

11-34-306

” preceding “be transmitted to the state treasurer” and made related changes.

Editor's notes. —

Section

21-15-106

, referred to in subsection (a), was repealed by Laws 1999, ch. 170, § 302.

Conflicting legislation. —

Laws 2005, ch. 231, § 3, provides: “The provisions of this act shall supersede the provisions of any other bill enacted into law during the 2005 general session which amends or references accounts or funds to the extent any other enactment is inconsistent with the establishment of the funds and accounts created under this act. The state auditor shall account for any fund or account created in any other legislation enacted in the 2005 general session in accordance with generally accepted accounting principles (GAAP) as promulgated by the governmental accounting standards board (GASB) and in accordance with this act.”

§ 11-34-203.
Report to governor; separate statement required.

The state loan and investment
board shall report to the governor as required by W.S.

9-2-1014

, and include a separate statement of all loans obtained
from the state treasurer by the issuance of bonds as herein provided,
and showing the disposition of the funds.

History.

Laws 1933, ch. 84, § 4; C.S. 1945, § 21-304; W.S. 1957, § 11-652; Laws 1973, ch. 215, § 1; W.S. 1977, § 11-39-302; Laws 1978, ch. 32, § 1; 1998, ch. 13, § 1.